Idaho statutes. Title 36 FISH AND GAME
Chapter 4
LICENSES TO HUNT, FISH AND TRAP

Sec.

§ 36-401. Hunting, trapping, fishing — License requirement — Exceptions.

No person shall hunt, trap, or fish for or take any wild animal, bird or fish of this state, without first having procured a license as hereinafter provided. Provided that no license shall be required:

1. For children under the age of fourteen (14) years who are residents of this state to fish during the open season therefor.

For any person to fish on a “free fishing day” as may be designated by the commission.

State Long-term Care Facility Residents. For any resident of a state long-term care facility to fish during open seasons, provided said state long-term care facility has a permit therefor from the director. The director is authorized to issue such permits upon the request of the head of the respective state long-term care facility having custody of said resident upon a showing that the state long-term care facility recommends the issuance of such permit and will assume full responsibility for and control over any resident while using said permit. For purposes of this subsection only, “state long-term care facility” shall mean the state hospital north, state hospital south, southwest Idaho treatment center, and state veterans homes, and “resident” shall mean any individual residing and receiving treatment services at a state long-term care facility.

State Juvenile Corrections Center Students. For students of the state juvenile corrections center, under the supervision of an officer of the center, to fish during the open season.

Boy Scouts. For boy scouts who are official participants in attendance at national or international encampments at Farragut State Park to take fish during the encampment period from Lake Pend Oreille in such areas and such numbers as may be designated by the commission.

Participants in Fish and Game Sponsored Functions. For persons who are official participants in attendance at official department sponsored functions including clinics, courses or other educational events, while under the supervision of a department approved instructor for the function, to fish during any open season, provided that the instructor has been issued an educational fishing permit by the director.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prohibit citizens of the United States who are residents of the state of Idaho from carrying arms for the protection of life and property.

2. For nonresident children under the age of fourteen (14) years to fish during the open season therefor provided they are accompanied by the holder of a valid fishing license, and provided further that any fish caught by such nonresident children shall be included in the bag and possession limit of such license holder.

3. For resident children under the age of twelve (12) years to hunt, take or kill predatory, unprotected birds and animals by means other than with firearms.

4. For resident children under the age of fourteen (14) years to trap muskrats from irrigation ditches or property on which they live during the open season.

5. For children under the age of eighteen (18) years who are residents of a licensed foster home or a children’s residential care facility to fish during the open season therefor, provided they are accompanied and supervised by the director, officer, or other employee of the facility where the child resides.

6. For children with life-threatening medical conditions participating in a hunt in association with a qualified organization as provided in section 36-408(6), Idaho Code.

7. For military veterans with disabilities participating in a hunt in association with a qualified organization as provided in section 36-408(7), Idaho Code.

8. For mentored hunters participating in a mentored hunting program as prescribed by the commission such that a person may apply to the department for a special authorization to take wildlife while accompanied by a mentor who possesses a valid Idaho hunting license and who is eighteen (18) years of age or older. At such time as a mentored hunter’s special authorization is no longer valid, nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as altering the requirements of section 36-411, Idaho Code, to obtain a valid hunting license.

§ 36-402. Licenses — Authority — Limitations — Confidentiality.

The licenses mentioned in this chapter shall entitle the person to whom issued to take such wildlife as may be authorized by said license, subject to the limitations set forth under this title and commission regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. Except as otherwise provided by law relating to the release of information to a governmental entity or law enforcement agency, any personal information including, but not limited to, names, personal and business addresses and phone numbers, sex, height, weight, date of birth, social security and driver’s license numbers, or any other identifying numbers and/or information related to any Idaho fish and game licenses, permits and tags shall be confidential and not subject to disclosure pursuant to the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, unless written consent is obtained from the affected person.

§ 36-403. Expiration dates — Licenses, tags and permits. — (a) Annual Licenses

Tags and Permits. All annual hunting and fishing licenses shall expire December 31 of the year for which they are valid. Trapping licenses shall expire on June 30 next following date of issuance. All tags and permits issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be valid only during the time that the corresponding basic license is valid.

(b) Senior Resident, Blind Person and Disabled Person Permits. All free senior resident, blind person and disabled person permits issued prior to July 1, 1998, shall expire on December 31, 1998. Thereafter, all senior resident, blind person and disabled person permits shall be an annual license.

§ 36-404. Classes of licenses.

The licenses required by the provisions of this title shall be of eight (8) classes. Classes one (1) through five (5) and eight (8) in this section may be purchased or obtained only by persons who meet residency requirements under the provisions of section 36-202(s) and (t), Idaho Code, or who are valid holders of a lifetime license certificate.

Class 1: Adult Combination — Hunting — Fishing — Trapping Licenses. Licenses to be issued only to persons who are residents of the state of Idaho.

Class 2: Junior Hunting — Trapping.

Junior hunting license. Licenses to be issued only to persons who are residents of the state of Idaho and are between ten (10) and seventeen (17) years of age, inclusive. Provided, that a license may be issued to qualified persons who are nine (9) years of age to allow the application for a controlled hunt big game tag or turkey permit; however, said persons shall not hunt until they are ten (10) years of age. Persons with a junior hunting license who are ten (10) or eleven (11) years of age shall be accompanied in the field by an adult licensed to hunt in the state of Idaho.

Junior trapping licenses. Licenses to be issued only to persons who are residents of the state of Idaho and are seventeen (17) years of age or younger.

Class 3: Junior Combination — Fishing Licenses. Licenses to be issued only to persons who are residents of the state of Idaho between fourteen (14) and seventeen (17) years of age, inclusive.

Class 4: Senior Resident Combination License. Licenses to be issued only to persons over sixty-five (65) years of age who meet the definition of “resident” pursuant to the provisions of section 36-202, Idaho Code.

Class 5: Resident Lifetime Combination — Hunting — Fishing License. Licenses to be issued only to persons who are valid holders of a lifetime license certificate.

Class 6: Nonresident Combination — Hunting — Fishing — Trapping — Junior Mentored Hunting — Disabled Hunting License for American Veteran — Licenses. Licenses required of persons who are nonresidents.

Class 7: Duplicate License — Tag. A license or tag to be issued as a replacement for an original license or tag lost or mutilated. Said license or tag shall be issued in the same class and type as the original and upon issuance of such duplicate license or tag the original license or tag shall become null and void.

Class 8: Resident Hunting and Fishing License with Tags, Permits and Stamps. Licenses to be issued only to persons who meet residency requirements under the provisions of section 36-202(s) and (t), Idaho Code.

§ 36-405. Application for license — Duplicate license — Unlawful purchase, possession, and use of license.

Application Required.

Any person making application for a senior resident license, or resident license shall provide his Idaho driver’s license number as proof of residence, or in the case of nondrivers, other suitable proof of residency, and state the class of license applied for, the name of the applicant, the age of the applicant, his date of birth, his length of residence, his current address, and such other information as may be required by the director.

Any person making application for a duplicate license shall state the type and class of license originally purchased and such other information as may be required by the director.

No person shall willfully make a false statement as to:

Name, age, his date of birth, length of residence or current address when such statement is made for the purpose of obtaining any license.

Type and class of original license purchased when applying for a duplicate license.

Loss of License — New One Required. In case of loss of a license, a new one shall be required to entitle the person who lost the same to hunt, fish or trap. Such person may upon application:

Purchase a new license at the regular fee; or

Replace a lost license with a duplicate license for which a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, shall be charged.

When a duplicate license has been issued the original license shall become null and void.

Unlawful Purchase, Possession and Use of License.

Every person buying a license must buy a license of the proper type or class according to his residence and age. No person shall purchase or possess a license of the wrong class and such license shall be void and of no effect from the date of issuance.

No person shall:

Acquire more than one (1) regular controlled hunt permit per species or more tags per species than the commission has set a bag limit for that species except as provided in subsection (b) of this section or to have said permits or tags in his possession.

Transfer any fishing, hunting, or trapping license to any other person or for any person to make use of such license issued to any other person with the exception of a parent or grandparent designating any controlled hunt tag or controlled hunt permit to his or her minor child or grandchild as prescribed by rules of the commission. A controlled hunt tag or controlled hunt permit can be designated only to a minor child with a valid hunting license or one who is participating in a mentored hunting program as prescribed by rules of the commission. A controlled hunt tag or controlled hunt permit designated to a minor child cannot be sold.

§ 36-406. Resident fishing, hunting and trapping licenses — Fees. — (a) Adult Licenses — Combination — Fishing — Hunting

Trapping. A license of the first class may be had by a person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined fishing and hunting license entitling the purchaser to hunt and fish for game animals, game birds, unprotected and predatory wildlife and fish of the state, a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a fishing license entitling the purchaser to fish in the public waters of the state, a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a hunting license entitling the purchaser to hunt game animals, game birds, unprotected and predatory wildlife of the state, and a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a trapping license entitling the purchaser to trap wolves, furbearing animals and unprotected and predatory wildlife of the state.

(b) Junior Licenses — Hunting — Trapping. A license of the second class may be had by a person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a hunting license, and a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a trapping license entitling the purchaser to the same privileges as the corresponding license of the first class provides.

(c) Junior Combination — Fishing Licenses. A license of the third class may be purchased by a person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined fishing and hunting license, and a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a fishing license entitling the purchaser to the same privileges as the corresponding license of the first class provides.

(d) Senior Resident Combination. A license of the fourth class may be had by a person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined fishing and hunting license entitling the purchaser to the same privileges as the corresponding license of the first class provides.

(e) Lifetime Licenses — Combination — Hunting — Fishing. A license of the fifth class may be obtained at no additional charge by a person possessing the qualifications therein described for a combined hunting and fishing license, for a hunting license, or for a fishing license, entitling the person to the same privileges as the corresponding license of the first class provides. Lifetime licensees must be certified under the provisions of section 36-413, Idaho Code, before being issued a license to hunt.

(f) A license of the eighth class may be had by a person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, entitling the purchaser to hunt and fish for game animals, game birds, fish, and unprotected and predatory wildlife of the state. With payment of the required fee, a person shall receive with this license a deer tag, an elk tag, a black bear tag, a turkey tag, a mountain lion tag, a wolf tag, an archery hunt permit, a muzzleloader permit, a steelhead trout permit and an anadromous salmon permit. The director shall promptly transmit to the state treasurer all moneys received pursuant to this subsection for deposit as follows:
(i) Five dollars and fifty cents ($5.50) in the fish and game set-aside account for the purposes of section 36-111(1)(a), Idaho Code;

All persons purchasing a license pursuant to this subsection shall observe and shall be subject to all rules of the commission regarding the fish and wildlife of the state.

If the purchaser of this license does not meet the archery education requirements of section 36-411(b), Idaho Code, then, notwithstanding the provisions of section 36-304, Idaho Code, the archery hunt permit portion of this license is invalid. The fee for this license will not change and the license must be issued without the archery permit validation.

(g) Disabled Persons Licenses — Combination — Fishing. A license of the first class may be had by any resident disabled person on payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined fishing and hunting license, and a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a fishing license, entitling the purchaser to the same privileges as the corresponding license of the first class provides. A disabled person means a person who is deemed disabled by one (1) or more, but not necessarily all, of the following: the railroad retirement board pursuant to title 45 of the United States Code, or certified as eligible for federal supplemental security income (SSI); or social security disability income (SSDI); or a nonservice-connected veterans pension; or a service-connected veterans disability benefit with forty percent (40%) or more disability; or certified as permanently disabled by a physician. Once determination of permanent disability has been made with the department, the determination shall remain on file within the electronic filing system and the license holder shall not be required to present a physician’s determination each year or prove their disability each year.

(h) Military Furlough Licenses — Combination — Fishing. A license of the first class may be had by a resident person engaged in the military service of the United States, while on temporary furlough or leave, possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined fishing and hunting license, and as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a fishing license.

(j) Junior Licenses — Three Year — Hunting. A license of the second class may be had by a person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a hunting license. The expiration date for said license shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.

(k) Junior Licenses — Three Year — Combination — Fishing Licenses. A license of the third class may be purchased by a person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined fishing and hunting license and three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a fishing license entitling the purchaser to the same privileges as the corresponding license of the first class provides. The expiration date for said licenses shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.

(l) Senior Resident Combination License — Three Year. A license of the fourth class may be had by a person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined fishing and hunting license entitling the purchaser to the same privileges as the corresponding license of the first class provides. The expiration date for said license shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.

(m) Disabled Persons Licenses — Three Year — Combination — Fishing. A license of the first class may be had by any resident disabled person possessing the qualifications therein described on payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined fishing and hunting license, and a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a fishing license entitling the purchaser to the same privileges as the corresponding license of the first class provides. The expiration date for said licenses shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.

§ 36-406A. Two pole permit.

The commission is authorized to promulgate rules specifying seasons and waters where a resident or nonresident may purchase a permit authorizing the person to use two (2) poles on waters that have been designated as “two pole” waters by commission rule subject to payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code. A person who has a two pole permit may utilize two (2) poles to fish with during the season so specified by commission rule and on the waters so specified by commission rule. Bona fide residents of Idaho who are expressly exempt from license requirements to fish in the public waters of the state may purchase a permit to use as an individual pursuant to this section as specified by commission rule. Unlicensed nonresident children under the age of fourteen (14) years shall be eligible to purchase a permit to use as an individual if accompanied by a holder of a valid license and provided that any fish caught by such nonresident children shall be included in the bag and possession limit of such license holder.

§ 36-407. Nonresident combination, fishing, hunting, and trapping licenses — Fees — Rights under.

Licenses of the sixth class shall be issued to nonresidents in the several kinds and for fees as follows:

Nonresident Hunting with Three Day Fishing License. A license issued only to a person twelve (12) years of age or older entitling said person to hunt game animals, game birds and unprotected and predatory wildlife and to purchase game tags as provided in section 36-409(b), Idaho Code, and to fish in the waters of the state for a period of three (3) consecutive days for any fish during an open season for those fish, excluding steelhead trout and anadromous salmon. Provided, that a license may be issued to qualified persons who are eleven (11) years of age to allow the application for a controlled hunt tag; however, said persons shall not hunt until they are twelve (12) years of age. A license of this kind may be had upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Nonresident Season Fishing License. A license entitling a person to fish in the public waters of the state. A license of this kind may be had upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Nonresident Trapping License. A license entitling a person to trap wolves, furbearing, unprotected and predatory wildlife. A license of this kind may be had upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, providing the state of residence of said person grants similar trapping license privileges to residents of Idaho.

Nonresident Nongame License. A nonresident nongame license to hunt is a license entitling a person to hunt unprotected birds and animals and predatory wildlife of this state. A license of this kind may be had by a nonresident person who is twelve (12) years of age or older upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Nonresident Small Game Hunting License. A license issued only to a person twelve (12) years of age or older, entitling the person to hunt upland game birds (to include turkeys), migratory game birds, upland game animals, huntable furbearing animals, and unprotected and predatory wildlife of this state. A person holding this license shall purchase the appropriate required tags and permits, and may not hunt pheasants in an area during the first five (5) days of the pheasant season in that area. A license of this type may be had upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Falconry Meet Permit. The director may issue a special permit for a regulated meet scheduled for a specific number of days upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code. Only trained raptors may be used under the special permit issued under the provisions of this subsection.

Daily Fishing License — Resident May Purchase. A license entitling a person to fish in the waters of the state on a day-to-day basis. A license of this kind may be had by a resident or nonresident person (the provisions of section 36-405, Idaho Code, notwithstanding), upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for the first effective day and a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for each consecutive day thereafter.

Nonresident Three Day Fishing License with Steelhead or Salmon Permit. A license entitling a nonresident to fish in the waters of the state for a period of three (3) consecutive days for any fish, including steelhead trout or anadromous salmon during an open season for those fish may be had upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code. The three (3) day license holder may fish for any species of fish, steelhead trout and anadromous salmon subject to the limitations prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission. A nonresident may purchase as many of the licenses provided in this subsection as he desires provided that the nonresident is otherwise eligible to do so.

Nonresident Junior Fishing License. A license entitling a nonresident who is less than eighteen (18) years of age to fish in the waters of this state may be had upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Nonresident Combination Licenses. A license entitling the person to hunt and fish for game animals, game birds, fish and unprotected and predatory wildlife of the state and to purchase game tags as provided in section 36-409(b), Idaho Code, may be had by a person twelve (12) years of age or older upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code. A license may be issued to a qualified person who is eleven (11) years of age to allow the application for a controlled hunt tag; however, the person shall not hunt until he is twelve (12) years of age.

Nonresident Junior Mentored Hunting License. A license entitling a nonresident between ten (10) and seventeen (17) years of age, inclusive, to hunt big game animals, upland game birds (including turkeys), migratory game birds, upland game animals, huntable furbearing animals and unprotected and predatory wildlife of this state only when accompanied in the field by the holder of an adult Idaho hunting license. A person holding this license shall purchase the appropriate required tags as provided in section 36-409(b), Idaho Code, and permits. Provided, that a license may be issued to qualified persons who are nine (9) years of age to allow the application for a controlled hunt big game tag or turkey permit; however, said persons shall not hunt until they are ten (10) years of age. A license of this kind may be had upon payment of a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Nonresident Disabled American Veteran Hunting with Three Day Fishing License. A license entitling a person with a service-connected veterans disability benefit with forty percent (40%) or more disability to hunt game animals, game birds and unprotected and predatory wildlife and to purchase game tags provided in section 36-409(b), Idaho Code, and to fish in the waters of the state for a period of three (3) consecutive days for any fish during an open season for those fish, excluding steelhead trout and anadromous salmon.

Nonresident Hunting License — Three Year. A license issued only to a person twelve (12) years of age or older entitling said person to hunt game birds, game animals, unprotected and predatory wildlife and to purchase game tags as provided in section 36-409(b), Idaho Code, and to fish in the waters of the state for a period of three (3) consecutive days in each license year for any fish during an open season for those fish, excluding steelhead trout and anadromous salmon. Provided, that a license may be issued to qualified persons who are eleven (11) years of age to allow the application for a controlled hunt tag; however, said persons shall not hunt until they are twelve (12) years of age. A license of this kind may be had upon payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code. The expiration date for said license shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.

Nonresident Season Fishing License — Three Year. A license entitling a person to fish in the public waters of the state. A license of this kind may be had upon payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a fishing license. The expiration date for said license shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.

Nonresident Combination Licenses — Three Year. A license entitling the person to hunt and fish for game animals, game birds, fish and unprotected and predatory wildlife of the state may be had by a person twelve (12) years of age or older upon payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a combined hunting and fishing license. A license may be issued to a qualified person who is eleven (11) years of age to allow the application for a controlled hunt tag; however, the person shall not hunt until he is twelve (12) years of age. The expiration date for said license shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.
(p) Nonresident Junior Mentored Hunting License — Three Year. A license entitling a nonresident between ten (10) and seventeen (17) years of age, inclusive, to hunt game animals, upland game birds (including turkeys), migratory game birds, and unprotected and predatory wildlife of this state only when accompanied in the field by the holder of an adult Idaho hunting license. A person holding this license shall purchase the appropriate required tags as provided in section 36-409(b), Idaho Code, and permits. Provided, that a license may be issued to qualified persons who are nine (9) years of age to allow the application for a controlled hunt turkey permit; however, said persons shall not hunt until they are ten (10) years of age. A license of this kind may be had upon payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a junior mentored hunting license. The expiration date for said license shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.

(q) Nonresident Junior Fishing License — Three Year. A license entitling a nonresident who is less than eighteen (18) years of age to fish in the waters of this state. A license of this kind may be had upon payment of three (3) times the fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for a nonresident junior fishing license. The expiration date for said license shall be December 31 of the third year following the date of issuance.